Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/sk.aff
SFX E Y 63
SFX E   ať          ám         ať
SFX E   ať          áš         ať
SFX E   ať          á          ať
SFX E   ať          áme        ať
SFX E   ať          áte        ať
SFX E   ať          ajú        ať
SFX E   ať          ajúc       ať
SFX E   ať          aj         ať
SFX E   ať          ajme       ať
SFX E   ať          ajte       ať
SFX E   ať          al         ať
SFX E   ať          ala        ať
SFX E   ať          alo        ať
SFX E   ať          ali        ať
SFX E   biť         b          biť
SFX E   čiť         č          čiť
SFX E   diť         ď          diť
SFX E   diť         ďme        diť
SFX E   diť         ďte        diť
SFX E   dziť        dz         dziť
SFX E   fiť         f          fiť
SFX E   giť         g          giť
SFX E   chiť        ch         chiť
SFX E   iť          a          jiť
SFX E   iť          ac         jiť
SFX E   jiť         j          jiť
SFX E   iť          ia         [^j]iť
SFX E   iť          iac        [^j]iť
SFX E   kiť         k          kiť
SFX E   liť         ľ          [aáäeéiíoóuúyý]liť
SFX E   liť         ľme        [aáäeéiíoóuúyý]liť
SFX E   liť         ľte        [aáäeéiíoóuúyý]liť
SFX E   iť          i          [^aáäeéiíoóuúyý]liť
SFX E   iť          ime        [^aáäeéiíoóuúyý]liť
SFX E   iť          ite        [^aáäeéiíoóuúyý]liť
SFX E   miť         m          miť
SFX E   niť         ň          niť
SFX E   niť         ňme        niť
SFX E   niť         ňte        niť
SFX E   piť         p          piť
SFX E   iť          i          riť	# opatriť
SFX E   iť          ime        riť
SFX E   iť          ite        riť
SFX E   viť         v          viť
SFX E   siť         s          siť
SFX E   šiť         š          šiť
SFX E   tiť         ť          tiť
SFX E   tiť         ťme        tiť
SFX E   tiť         ťte        tiť
SFX E   ziť         z          ziť
SFX E   žiť         ž          žiť
SFX E   iť          me         iť
SFX E   iť          te         [^dlnrt]iť
SFX E   iť          ím         iť
SFX E   iť          íš         iť
SFX E   iť          í          iť
SFX E   iť          íme        iť
SFX E   iť          íte        iť
SFX E   iť          ia         iť
SFX E   ť           l          iť
SFX E   ť           la         iť
SFX E   ť           lo         iť
SFX E   ť           li         iť
